Tennessee, session 114, HB1348.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 49-7-202(f), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(4) The commission shall review and update the outcomes-based funding
formula model at least once every five (5) years to provide incentives for institutions that
offer programs leading to job placement in high-demand fields in this state.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1348
003369
- 1 -